Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1821HH (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 345 Section 1. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ 1 STATE CHILD CARE ASSISTANCE ELIGIBILITY. The department of 2 health and human services shall amend its administrative rules 3 pursuant to chapter 17A to provide income eligibility for state 4 child care assistance, according to family size for children 5 needing basic care, to families whose nonexempt gross monthly 6 income does not exceed one hundred eighty-five percent of the 7 federal poverty level for a child needing basic care, or two 8 hundred forty percent of the federal poverty level for a child 9 needing special-needs care. 10